Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.125

Assistance to counties and cities.

The department of commerce shall provide training and technical assistance to counties and cities to assist them in fulfilling the requirements of chapter 36.70B RCW.

[ 2009 c 565 s 7; 1995 c 347 s 430.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—Part headings and table of contents not law—1995 c 347: See notes following RCW 36.70A.470.